North Dakota, session 69, SB2359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 49-02-26 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
49-02-26. Qualifying for renewable electricity and recycled energy credits - Exception for
certain hydroelectric facilities.
Except as otherwise provided in this section, forFor purposes of qualifying for renewable electricity
and recycled energy credits, electricity must be generated from a source identified in section 49-02-25.
For electricity generated from hydroelectric facilities, the hydroelectric facility must have an inservice
date of January 1, 2007, or later, or be new hydroelectric generation obtained from repowering or
efficiency improvements to hydroelectric facilities existing on August 1, 2007.
SECTION 2. REPEAL. Sections 49-02-28, 49-02-29, 49-02-30, 49-02-31, 49-02-32, 49-02-33, and
49-02-34 of the North Dakota Century Code are repealed.

S. B. NO. 2359 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2359.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 83 Nays 9 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State